test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h27_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: systkin
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: systkin
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: systkjum
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: systkina
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: systkini
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: systkini
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: systkjunum
    systkin+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: systkinanna
